Utah statutes.
17-33-6.   Certification of eligibility by director -- Power of director to examine payrolls.

No new employee shall be hired in a position covered by this chapter, and no employee shall be changed in pay, title, or status, nor shall any employee be paid, unless certified by the director as eligible under the provisions of, or regulations promulgated under, this chapter. The director of personnel management may examine payrolls at any time to determine conformity with this chapter and the county rules.



Enacted by Chapter 81, 1981 General Session

